Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1695YH (4) 91 lh/ko H.F. 137 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Adopt a policy requiring that not 3 less than eighty percent of the students who are accepted at 4 the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program, who 5 are accepted at the college of nursing, and who are accepted 6 at the college of dentistry at the state university of Iowa be 7 residents of Iowa or persons who were, prior to applying to 8 such college, enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution 9 as defined in section 261E.2. 10 Sec. 2. Section 263.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 263.2 Degrees ââ reports . 13 1. A person shall not be admitted to courses of instruction 14 in the university if the person has not completed the 15 elementary instruction in such branches as are taught in the 16 public or accredited nonpublic schools throughout the state. 17 2. Graduates of the university shall receive degrees or 18 diplomas, or other evidences of distinction such as are usually 19 conferred and granted by universities and are authorized by the 20 state board of regents. 21 3. The university of Iowa, in collaboration with the 22 university hospitals and clinics, shall submit an annual report 23 to the general assembly providing the following information: 24 a. The states in which members of each graduating class 25 from the college of dentistry, the college of nursing, and 26 the college of medicineâs doctor of medicine program reside 27 during the year immediately following graduation. The 28 information shall be divided by residents of Iowa at the time 29 of application to the college and nonresidents at the time of 30 application to the college. 31 b. The states in which the university of Iowa hospitals 32 and clinics primary care and specialty residents reside in the 33 year following completion of medical residency and whether 34 following residency such residents accepted fellowships. The 35 -1- LSB 1695YH (4) 91 lh/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 137 information shall be divided by primary care and various areas 1 of specialty, and whether the medical residents were residents 2 of Iowa prior to applying for admission at an undergraduate 3 college or university, received a baccalaureate degree from 4 a postsecondary institution in Iowa, or graduated from a 5 medical school in Iowa, whether or not the medical residents 6 were residents of the state at the time of acceptance into the 7 university of Iowa hospitals and clinicsâ residency programs 8 and, if any residents accepted fellowships following residency, 9 the states in which the fellowships are offered and the areas 10 of specialty under the fellowships. 11